Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.410

Settlement.

(1) If, during arbitral proceedings, the parties settle the dispute, the arbitral tribunal shall terminate the proceedings and, if requested by the parties and not objected to by the arbitral tribunal, record the settlement in the form of an arbitral award on agreed terms.

(2) An award on agreed terms shall be made in accordance with the provisions of RCW 7.05.420 and shall state that it is an award. Such an award has the same status and effect as any other award on the merits of the case.

[ 2015 c 276 s 41.]